Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 4

12-8-110.

Reserved.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, the designation of this Code section was reserved.

Editor's notes.

- This article formerly pertained to the Georgia Hazardous Waste Management Authority. The former article was repealed by Ga. L. 2001, p. 875,

§

5, effective July 1, 2001. The former article consisted of Code Sections 12-8-100 through 12-8-103, 12-8-103.1 and 12-8-103.2, 12-8-104 through 12-8-112, 12-8-112.1 and 12-8-112.2, and 12-8-113, relating to hazardous waste management, and was based on Ga. L. 1981, p. 462,

§§

1-14; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3,

§

12; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426,

§

1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1934,

§§

1-3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1641,

§

9; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1983,

§§

1-2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1740,

§§

1-6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6,

§

12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234,

§

6; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91,

§

12.